Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Chapter 6. General Provisions.
§ 4.1-614.
Disposition of moneys collected by the Board.

All moneys collected by the Board shall be paid directly and promptly into the state treasury, or shall be deposited to the credit of the State Treasurer in a state depository, without any deductions on account of salaries, fees, costs, charges, expenses, refunds, or claims of any description whatever, as required by §

2.2-1802

.All moneys so paid into the state treasury, less the net profits determined pursuant to subsection C, shall be set aside as and constitute an Enterprise Fund, subject to appropriation, for the payment of (i) the salaries and remuneration of the members, agents, and employees of the Board and (ii) all costs and expenses incurred in the administration of this subtitle.

The net profits derived under the provisions of this subtitle shall be transferred by the Comptroller to the general fund of the state treasury quarterly, within 50 days after the close of each quarter or as otherwise provided in the appropriation act. As allowed by the Governor, the Board may deduct from the net profits quarterly a sum for the creation of a reserve fund not exceeding the sum of $2.5 million in connection with the administration of this subtitle and to provide for the depreciation on the buildings, plants, and equipment owned, held, or operated by the Board. After accounting for the Authority’s expenses as provided in subsection A, net profits shall be appropriated in the general appropriation act as follows:

Forty percent to pre-kindergarten programs for at-risk three-year-olds and four-year-olds;

Thirty percent to the Cannabis Equity Reinvestment Fund established pursuant to §

2.2-2499.8

;

Twenty-five percent to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, which shall distribute such appropriated funds to community services boards for the purpose of administering substance use disorder prevention and treatment programs; and

Five percent to public health programs, including public awareness campaigns that are designed to prevent drugged driving, discourage consumption by persons younger than 21 years of age, and inform the public of other potential risks.

As used in this section, “net profits” means the total of all moneys collected by the Board, less local marijuana tax revenues collected under § 4.1-1004 and distributed pursuant to §

4.1-614

and all costs, expenses, and charges authorized by this section.

All local tax revenues collected under § 4.1-1004 shall be paid into the state treasury as provided in subsection A and credited to a special fund, which is hereby created on the Comptroller’s books under the name “Collections of Local Marijuana Taxes.” The revenues shall be credited to the account of the locality in which they were collected. If revenues were collected from a marijuana establishment located in more than one locality by reason of the boundary line or lines passing through the marijuana establishment, tax revenues shall be distributed pro rata among the localities. The Authority shall provide to the Comptroller any records and assistance necessary for the Comptroller to determine the locality to which tax revenues are attributable.On a quarterly basis, the Comptroller shall draw his warrant on the Treasurer of Virginia in the proper amount in favor of each locality entitled to the return of its tax revenues, and such payments shall be charged to the account of each such locality under the special fund created by this section. If errors are made in any such payment, or adjustments are otherwise necessary, whether attributable to refunds to taxpayers, or to some other fact, the errors shall be corrected and adjustments made in the payments for the next quarter.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

§ 4.1-615.
Leases and purchases of property by the Board.

The making of leases and the purchasing of real estate by the Board under the provisions of this subtitle are exempt from the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.). The Authority shall be exempt from the provisions of §

2.2-1149

and from any rules, regulations, and guidelines of the Division of Engineering and Buildings in relation to leases of real property into which it enters.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

§ 4.1-616.
Exemptions from taxes or assessments.

The exercise of the powers granted by this subtitle shall be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their living conditions, and as the undertaking of activities in the furtherance of the purposes of the Authority constitutes the performance of essential governmental functions, the Authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any property acquired or used by the Authority under the provisions of this subtitle or upon the income therefrom, including sales and use taxes on the tangible personal property used in the operations of the Authority. The exemption granted in this section shall not be construed to extend to persons conducting on the premises of any property of the Authority businesses for which local or state taxes would otherwise be required.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

§ 4.1-617.
Exemption of Authority from personnel and procurement procedures; information systems; etc.

The provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) and the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) shall not apply to the Authority in the exercise of any power conferred under this subtitle. Nor shall the provisions of Chapter 20.1 (§

2.2-2005

et seq.) of Title 2.2 or Article 2 (§

51.1-1104

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 51.1 apply to the Authority in the exercise of any power conferred under this subtitle.

To effect its implementation, the Authority’s procurement of goods, services, insurance, and construction and the disposition of surplus materials shall be exempt from:

State agency requirements regarding disposition of surplus materials and distribution of proceeds from the sale or recycling of surplus materials under §§

2.2-1124

and

2.2-1125

;

The requirement to purchase from the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired under §

2.2-1117

; and

Any other state statutes, rules, regulations, or requirements relating to the procurement of goods, services, insurance, and construction, including Article 3 (§

2.2-1109

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 2.2, regarding the duties, responsibilities, and authority of the Division of Purchases and Supply of the Department of General Services, and Article 4 (§

2.2-1129

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 2.2, regarding the review and the oversight by the Division of Engineering and Buildings of the Department of General Services of contracts for the construction of the Authority’s capital projects and construction-related professional services under §

2.2-1132

.

The Authority (i) may purchase from and participate in all statewide contracts for goods and services, including information technology goods and services; (ii) shall use directly or by integration or interface the Commonwealth’s electronic procurement system subject to the terms and conditions agreed upon between the Authority and the Department of General Services; and (iii) shall post on the Department of General Services’ central electronic procurement website all Invitations to Bid, Requests for Proposal, sole source award notices, and emergency award notices to ensure visibility and access to the Authority’s procurement opportunities on one website.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

§ 4.1-618.
Reversion to the Commonwealth.

In the event of the dissolution of the Authority, all assets of the Authority, after satisfaction of creditors, shall revert to the Commonwealth.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

§ 4.1-619.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail; electronic communications as alternative to regular mail; limitation.

Whenever in this subtitle the Board is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board may be sent by regular mail.

Except as provided in subsection C, whenever in this subtitle the Board is required or permitted to send any mail, notice, or other official communication by regular mail to persons licensed under Chapter 8 (§ 4.1-800 et seq.), upon the request of a licensee, the Board may instead send such mail, notice, or official communication by email, text message, or other electronic means to the email address, telephone number, or other contact information provided to the Board by the licensee, provided that the Board retains sufficient proof of the electronic delivery, which may be an electronic receipt of delivery or a certificate of service prepared by the Board confirming the electronic delivery.

No notice required by § 4.1-903 to a licensee of a hearing that may result in the suspension or revocation of his license or the imposition of a civil penalty shall be sent by the Board by email, text message, or other electronic means, nor shall any decision by the Board to suspend or revoke a license or impose a civil penalty be sent by the Board by email, text message, or other electronic means.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

§ 4.1-620.
Reports and accounting systems of Board; auditing books and records.

The Board shall make reports to the Governor as he may require covering the administration and enforcement of this subtitle. Additionally, the Board shall submit an annual report to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Chief Executive Officer of the Authority on or before December 15 each year, which shall contain:

The number of state licenses of each category issued pursuant to this subtitle;

Demographic information concerning the licensees;

A description of enforcement and disciplinary actions taken against licensees;

A statement of revenues and expenses related to the implementation, administration, and enforcement of this subtitle;

A statement showing the taxes collected under this subtitle during the year;

General information and remarks about the working of the cannabis control laws within the Commonwealth;

A description of the efforts undertaken by the Board to promote diverse business ownership within the cannabis industry; and

Any other information requested by the Governor.

The Board shall maintain an accounting system in compliance with generally accepted accounting principles and approved in accordance with §

2.2-803

.

A regular postaudit shall be conducted of all accounts and transactions of the Board. An annual audit of a fiscal and compliance nature of the accounts and transactions of the Board shall be conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts on or before October 1. The cost of the annual audit and postaudit examinations shall be borne by the Board. The Board may order such other audits as it deems necessary.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

§ 4.1-621.
Certain information not to be made public.

Neither the Board nor its employees shall divulge any information regarding (i) financial reports or records required pursuant to this subtitle; (ii) the purchase orders and invoices for retail marijuana or retail marijuana products filed with the Board by marijuana wholesaler licensees; (iii) taxes collected from, refunded to, or adjusted for any person; or (iv) information contained in the seed-to-sale tracking system maintained by the Board pursuant to §

4.1-611

. The provisions of §

58.1-3

shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to taxes collected pursuant to this subtitle and to purchase orders and invoices for retail marijuana or retail marijuana products filed with the Board by marijuana wholesaler licensees.

Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the use or release of such information or documents by the Board to any governmental or law-enforcement agency, or when considering the granting, denial, revocation, or suspension of a license or permit, or the assessment of any penalty against a licensee or permittee, nor shall this section prohibit the Board or its employees from compiling and disseminating to any member of the public aggregate statistical information pertaining to (a) tax collection, as long as such information does not reveal or disclose tax collection from any identified licensee; (b) the total amount of retail marijuana or retail marijuana products sales in the Commonwealth by marijuana wholesaler licensees collectively; or (c) the total amount of purchases or sales submitted by licensees, provided that such information does not identify the licensee.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”